North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
“I. Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall authorize, pay for, and manage services currently offered under the 1915(b)/(c) Waivers, including coverage of 1915(b)(3) services, within their capitation payments.

“II.
Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall operate care coordination functions.

“III. Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall oversee home and community-based services.

“IV. Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall maintain closed provider networks for behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services and shall ensure network adequacy.

“V.
Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall manage provider rates.

“VI. Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall provide Local Business Plans.

“VII. The State Consumer and Family Advisory Committees shall continue to operate and advise DHHS and entities operating the BH IDD Tailored Plans.

“2. During the contract term of the initial contracts for BH IDD Tailored Plans to begin one year after the implementation of the first contracts for Standard Benefit Plans and to last four years, an LME/MCO shall be the only entity that may operate a BH IDD Tailored Plan. LME/MCOs operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall receive all capitation payments under the BH IDD Tailored Plan contracts. Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plan contracts shall conduct care coordination administrative functions for all services offered through the BH IDD Tailored Plans, and shall bear all risk for service utilization. This sub-sub-subdivision shall not be construed to preclude an entity operating a BH IDD Tailored Plan from engaging in incentives, risk sharing, or other contractual arrangements.

“3. During the contract term of the initial contracts for BH IDD Tailored Plans to begin one year after the implementation of the first contracts for Standard Benefit Plans and to last four years, BH IDD Tailored Plans shall be operated only by LME/MCOs that meet certain criteria established by DHHS. Any LME/MCO desiring to operate a BH IDD Tailored Plan will make an application to DHHS in response to this set of criteria. Approval to operate a BH IDD Tailored Plan will be contingent upon a comprehensive readiness review. The constituent counties of the existing LME/MCOs may change, or existing LME/MCOs may merge or be acquired by another LME/MCO, as allowed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, prior to operating a BH IDD Tailored Plan, provided that DHHS ensures every county in the State is covered by an LME/MCO that operates a BH IDD Tailored Plan. DHHS shall issue no more than seven and no fewer than five regional BH IDD Tailored Plan contracts and shall not issue any statewide BH IDD Tailored Plan contracts.

“4. After the term of the initial contracts for BH IDD Tailored Plans to last four years, BH IDD Tailored Plan contracts will be the result of RFPs issued by DHHS and the submission of competitive bids from nonprofit PHPs and entities operating the initial BH IDD Tailored Plan contracts.

“5. LME/MCOs operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall contract with an entity that holds a PHP license and that covers the services required to be covered under a Standard Benefit Plan contract.

“6. Entities operating BH IDD Tailored Plans shall utilize closed provider networks only for the provision of behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services, notwithstanding sub-subdivision d. of subdivision (6) of Section 5 of this act.

“7. Entities authorized to operate BH IDD Tailored Plans shall be in compliance with applicable State law, regulations, and policy and shall meet certain criteria established by DHHS. These criteria shall include the ability to coordinate activities with local governments, county departments of social services, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, and other related agencies.

“8. BH IDD Tailored Plans shall cover the behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services excluded from Standard Benefit Plan coverage under sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (4) of this section, in addition to the services required to be covered by all PHPs under subdivision (4) of this section.

“9. Entities authorized to operate BH IDD Tailored Plans shall continue to manage non-Medicaid behavioral health services funded with federal, State, and local funding in accordance with Chapter 122C of the General Statutes and other applicable State and federal law, rules, and regulations.

“10. Recipients described in sub-subdivision
l
. of subdivision (5) of this section shall be automatically enrolled with an entity operating a BH IDD Tailored Plan and shall have the option to enroll with a PHP operating a Standard Benefit Plan, provided that a recipient electing to enroll with a PHP operating a Standard Benefit Plan would only have access to the behavioral health services covered by the Standard Benefit Plans and would no longer have access to the behavioral health services excluded from Standard Benefit Plan coverage under sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (4) of this section, and provided that the recipient’s informed consent shall be required prior to the recipient’s enrollment with a PHP operating a Standard Benefit Plan.

“b. No later than June 22, 2018, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice with a plan for the implementation of BH IDD Tailored Plans. At a minimum, the report shall contain the following:

“1. The date when BH IDD Tailored Plans are planned to be operational.

“2. The proposed parameters for contracts between LME/MCOs and partnering entities to operate a BH IDD Tailored Plan, including, but not limited to, incentive arrangements for providing integrated care and for achieving measurable outcomes, and strategies to minimize cost-shifting between the LME/MCO and the partnering entity.

“3. Proposed language for any legislative changes needed to implement the plan.

“4. A detailed description of the process by which recipients will be able to transition between BH IDD Tailored Plans and Standard Benefit Plans. At a minimum, this process must include the following:

“I. The proposed definition for a qualifying event, after which a Standard Benefit Plan enrollee would be eligible to enroll with a BH IDD Tailored Plan, and the proposed process for rapid enrollment in a BH IDD Tailored Plan after a qualifying event.

“II.
A process for the periodic evaluation of BH IDD Tailored Plan enrollees with criteria to determine whether enrollees continue to require the comprehensive services managed by the BH IDD Tailored Plans or whether their needs can be adequately met through coverage by a Standard Benefit Plan.

“III. A detailed description of the process and criteria to be used for the assessments that are required under sub-subdivision
l
. of subdivision (5) of this section [now
G.S. 108D-40(a)(12)] of individuals after their second visit to an emergency department for a psychiatric problem within the prior 18 months or after their second episode using behavioral health crisis services within the prior 18 months.

“IV. The manner by which a recipient’s continuation of care shall be ensured when the recipient transitions between BH IDD Tailored Plans and Standard Benefit Plans or between Standard Benefit Plans and BH IDD Tailored Plans. This process should include a consideration of the maintenance of the recipient’s care providers as well as any prior authorization approvals existing prior to the recipient transitioning between these two plans.

“5. An estimate of State spending under the 1115 Waiver if BH IDD Tailored Plans are implemented compared to an estimate of State spending under the 1115 Waiver if BH IDD Tailored Plans are not implemented.

“6. Specific measureable outcomes, along with a time frame for the achievement of each measureable outcome, to be included in the capitated PHP contracts for BH IDD Tailored Plans.

“7. A description of the solvency requirements for LME/MCOs operating BH IDD Tailored Plans describing how the solvency requirements relate to the solvency standards for PHPs set by the Department of Insurance under Section 6 of this act and how they relate to the solvency standards for LME/MCOs.

“8. Any anticipated barriers to the ability of BH IDD Tailored Plans to meet the standardized contract terms described in subdivision (6) of Section 5 of this act [much of subdivision (6) is now codified as

G.S. 108D-65

].

“9. Justification and proposed guidelines for the management of the closed provider networks utilized by the BH IDD Tailored Plans as required by sub-sub-subdivision 6. of sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.

“10. A plan for adding recipients who are being served through the CAP/C program to the populations covered by BH IDD Tailored Plans.

“11. A plan for transitioning children aged zero to three years old with, or at risk for, developmental delay or disability.

“12. A plan for adding coverage, under BH IDD Tailored Plans or another specialty plan, of all recipients who are enrolled in the foster care system, who are enrolled in Medicaid under the former foster care eligibility category, who receive Title IV-E Adoption Assistance, or who are under the age of 26 and formerly received Title IV-E Adoption Assistance. This plan shall include assurances that these recipients will be supported in instances when they have a change in residence.

“c. After receiving the report required by sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice may recommend that the General Assembly consider proposed legislation during the 2018 Regular Session containing any modifications to the law that are necessary to implement BH IDD Tailored Plans.

“d. Beginning August 31, 2018, or when authorized by a subsequent act of the General Assembly, whichever comes first, DHHS is authorized to take any actions necessary to implement BH IDD Tailored Plans in accordance with all the requirements in this act, including all the requirements enumerated under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.”

“Section 5. Codified as

G.S. 108D-65

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(10), effective October 1, 2019, except: [Sub-subdivision d. of subdivision (6) and subdivisions (10), (11), (12), and (13), as set out below, were not codified.]

“d. A requirement that PHPs develop and maintain provider networks that meet access to care requirements for their enrollees. PHPs may not exclude providers from their networks except for failure to meet objective quality standards or refusal to accept network rates. Notwithstanding the previous sentence, PHPs must include all providers in their geographical coverage area that are designated essential providers by DHHS pursuant to subdivision (13) of this section, unless DHHS approves an alternative arrangement for securing the types of services offered by the essential providers.

“(10) Require all PHPs and Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers to submit data through the Health Information Exchange Network, as required by Section 12A.5 of House Bill 97, 2015 Regular Session, in order to ensure effective systems and connectivity to support clinical coordination of care, the exchange of information, and the availability of data to DHHS and the Division of Health Benefits to manage the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs for the State.

“(11) Develop a Dual Eligibles Advisory Committee, which must include at least a reasonably representative sample of the populations receiving long-term services and supports covered by Medicaid. DHHS upon the advice of the Dual Eligibles Advisory Committee, shall develop a long-term strategy to cover dual eligibles through capitated PHP contracts and report the strategy to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice by January 31, 2017.

“(12) Report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice by March 1, 2016. At a minimum, this report shall include:

“a. The proposed waiver application.

“b. The expected time frame for the submission of the proposed waiver to CMS.

“c. Proposed statutory changes required.

“d. Status of staffing of the Division of Health Benefits, including a description of staff’s key competencies and expertise.

“e. Anticipated distribution of regional capitated PHP contracts.

“f. Plans for recipient enrollment.

“g. Recipient access standards.

“h. Performance measures.

“i. A plan for the proposed inclusion of the following features as part of Medicaid and NC Health Choice transformation:

“1. Rate floors in addition to those required by subdivision (5) of Section 5 of this act [see now

G.S. 108D-65

].

“2. Antitrust policies.

“3. Protections against the exclusion of certain provider types.

“4. Prompt pay requirements.

“5. Uniform credentialing requirements.

“6. Good-faith negotiations.

“j. Time line for issuance of RFP and solicitation of bids.

“k. Measures for sustainability of the transformed system.

“
l
. A plan for transition of features of the contract with the North Carolina Community Care Network, Inc., (NCCCN) to the new delivery system, including a plan for utilizing, at the appropriate time, the Health Information Exchange Network to perform certain functions presently being performed by NCCCN’s Informatics Center in conjunction with the primary care case management program.

“m. A plan to stabilize the Division of Medical Assistance during the transition of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs to the Division of Health Benefits.

“n. A plan that will ensure continuity of services for individuals in foster care and adoptive placements in the transformed Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs.

“(13) Designate Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers as essential providers if the provider either offers services that are not available from any other provider within a reasonable access standard or provides a substantial share of the total units of a particular service utilized by Medicaid and NC Health Choice recipients within the region during the last three years, and the combined capacity of other service providers in the region is insufficient to meet the total needs of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice enrollees. DHHS shall not classify physicians and other practitioners as essential providers. At a minimum, providers in the following categories shall be designated essential providers:

“a. Federally qualified health centers.

“b. Rural health centers.

“c. Free clinics.

“d. Local health departments.

“e. State Veterans Home.

“Section 6. Role of the Department of Insurance. — The transformed Medicaid and NC Health Choice system shall include the licensing of PHPs, as required by subdivision (2) of Section 4 of this act, based on solvency requirements established and implemented by the Department of Insurance. The Commissioner of Insurance, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Health Benefits, shall develop recommended solvency requirements that are similar to the solvency requirements for similarly situated regulated entities and recommended licensing procedures that include an annual review by the Commissioner and reporting of changes in licensure to the Division of Health Benefits. The Commissioner shall report the recommendations as well as proposed fees to offset the cost of licensure and any necessary statutory changes to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice by March 1, 2016.

“Section 7. Primary Care Case Management. — By July 1, 2016, DHHS will renegotiate its contract with North Carolina Community Care Networks, Inc., (NCCCN) to reduce per member per month payments to NCCCN for administration, including informatics, by fifteen percent (15%) from the amount of per member per month payments NCCCN received for January 2015. The renegotiated contract shall provide for greater efficiencies and facilitate a smooth transition of features of the enhanced primary care case management program, including case management, informatics center operations, and practice supports, to the primary care medical home model or other care management model that will be utilized by PHPs, consistent with the plan reported to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice pursuant to subdivision (12) of Section 5 of this act. The renegotiated contract shall also include performance measures and consequences for failing to meet those performance measures. DHHS shall continue to utilize NCCCN to perform existing functions until capitated PHP contracts begin as required by this act. When capitated PHP contracts begin, any contract with NCCCN existing on that date shall terminate. Funds equal to the amount of any savings achieved on or after August 1, 2015, by the Division of Medical Assistance as a result of the contract renegotiation required by this section shall be transferred to the Division of Health Benefits to be used for the transition to capitated PHP contracts.

“Section 7A. Codified as

G.S. 108D-70

by Session Laws
2019-81, s. 14(a)(11), effective October 1, 2019.

“Section 8. Innovations Center. — DHHS shall submit a program design and budget proposal no later than May 1, 2016, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice that will create a Medicaid and NC Health Choice Transformation Innovations Center with the purpose of assisting Medicaid and NC Health Choice providers in achieving the ultimate goals of better health, better care, and lower costs for North Carolinians. The center should be designed to support providers through technical assistance and learning collaboratives that foster peer-to-peer sharing of best practices. DHHS shall use the Oregon Health Authority’s Transformation Center as a design model and shall consider at least the following features:

“(1) Learning collaboratives, peer-to-peer networks.

“(2) Clinical standards and supports.

“(3) Innovator agents.

“(4) Council of Clinical Innovators.

“(5) Community and stakeholder engagement.

“(6) Conferences and workshops.

“(7) Technical assistance.

“(8) Infrastructure support.

“Section 9. Maintain Funding Mechanisms. — In developing the waivers and State Plan amendments necessary to implement this act, DHHS shall work with the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS) to attempt to preserve existing levels of funding generated from Medicaid-specific funding streams, such as assessments, to the extent that the levels of funding may be preserved. If such Medicaid-specific funding cannot be maintained as currently implemented, then DHHS shall advise the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, created in Section 15 of this act, of any modifications necessary to maintain as much revenue as possible within the context of Medicaid transformation. If such Medicaid-specific funding streams cannot be preserved through the transformation process or if revenue would decrease, it is the intent of the General Assembly to modify such funding streams so that any supplemental payments to providers are more closely aligned to improving health outcomes and achieving overall Medicaid goals.

“Section 9A. Eligibility for Parents of Children in Foster Care. — DHHS is authorized to seek approval from CMS through the 1115 waiver required by subdivision (1) of Section 5 of this act [see now
G.S. 108D-65(1)] to allow parents to retain Medicaid eligibility while their child is being served temporarily by the foster care program. It is the intent of the General Assembly to expand Medicaid eligibility to cover this population upon implementation of the 1115 waiver, if CMS approves this coverage in the waiver.”

Session Laws
2018-49, s. 8(a)-(c), provides: “(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to enact legislation, no later than March 15, 2019, that will ensure that the premium tax levied under

G.S. 105-228.5

applies to capitation payments received by Prepaid Health Plans, as defined in
G.S. 58-93-2, in the same manner in which the tax is applied to the gross premiums from business done in this State for all other health care plans and contracts of insurance provided by insurers or health maintenance organizations subject to the tax.

“(b) Until March 15, 2019, or such earlier date as the legislation described in subsection (a) of this section is enacted, the Department of Health and Human Services shall plan for the implementation of Medicaid transformation with the assumption that such legislation will be enacted. If the General Assembly has not ratified the legislation described in subsection (a) of this section by March 15, 2019, then the Department of Health and Human Services shall plan for the implementation of Medicaid transformation with the assumption that such legislation will be not enacted, and the Department shall correct all actions taken in reliance on the previous assumption, including the reissuance of the requests for proposals for capitated PHP contracts, if necessary.

“(c) By October 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice containing proposed legislative changes necessary to accomplish the intent set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The report shall include the following:

“(1) Assurances that the proposed legislative changes do not violate federal Medicaid laws or regulations.

“(2) An estimate of the amount of increase in revenue that is anticipated as a result of the proposed legislative changes, and any proposed uses for the increase in revenue.”

Session Laws
2018-49, s. 10, provides: “The time frame within which the Department of Health and Human Services shall issue the requests for proposals required by subdivision (6) of Section 5 of S.L. 2015-245, as amended by Section 2(c) of S.L. 2016-121 and Section 6(b) of this act, shall be as follows:

“(1) If the 1115 demonstration waiver request submitted as required by this act on June 1, 2016, as amended, is not approved before the expiration of the 60 days after this act becomes law, then within 60 days after this act becomes law.

“(2) If the 1115 demonstration waiver request submitted as required by this act on June 1, 2016, as amended, is approved before the expiration of the 60 days after this act becomes law, then within 60 days after this act becomes law, or 30 days after the date of the waiver approval, whichever is later.”

Session Laws
2020-88, s. 7(b), (c), provides: “(b) The Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall amend the statewide and regional standard benefit plan prepaid health plan capitated contracts awarded as of June 1, 2020, so that the contract covers four contract year terms, instead of three, with the option to extend the contract for up to one successive contract year or a shorter period as required by DHHS.

“(c) If any prepaid health plan declines in writing to DHHS the contract amendment required under subsection (b) of this section, then that contract amendment shall not be required and the contract terms shall remain as in effect on June 1, 2020, until and unless amended by a future agreement.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11F.9(a)-(d), as amended by Session Laws
2017-212, s. 3.3, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall establish an adult and pediatric traumatic brain injury pilot program, to be conducted at not less than three and not more than five trauma hospitals licensed in this State. The purpose of the pilot program is to increase compliance with internationally approved evidence-based treatment guidelines for severe adult and pediatric traumatic brain injury in order to reduce patient mortality, improve patient level of recovery, and reduce long-term care costs.

“(b) Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2017-2018 fiscal year and the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2018-2019 fiscal year shall be used to enter into a contract with an independent entity to operate the pilot program authorized by this section. In so doing, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall select an independent entity that has (i) developed software for an interactive quality assessment and quality assurance clinical decision support tool that provides real-time, evidence-based medical care guidance for intensive care unit patients with severe adult or pediatric traumatic brain injury and (ii) prior experience assisting trauma hospitals in other states in implementing this software. In consideration for payments made to the independent entity under the contract, the independent entity shall assume responsibility for all of the following:

“(1) Initiating and operating the pilot program, including the selection of not less than three and not more than five trauma hospitals licensed in this State to serve as pilot program sites.

“(2) Assisting participating trauma hospitals in implementing the software developed by the independent entity for use as an interactive quality assessment and quality assurance clinical decision support tool to provide real-time, evidence-based medical care guidance for intensive care unit patients with severe adult or pediatric traumatic brain injury. In providing such implementation assistance, the independent entity shall utilize the treatment guidelines and practice recommendations that have been peer reviewed and approved by the American Association of Neurological Surgeons and are recognized as the current standard of care for individuals with severe traumatic brain injury.

“(c) By February 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a progress report on the development and implementation of the pilot program authorized by this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11H.14(a), (b), provides: “(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide Medicaid and NC Health Choice coverage for evidence-based home visits for pregnant women and families with young children designed to improve maternal and child health, prevent child abuse and neglect, encourage positive parenting, and promote child development and school readiness that are consistent with the model used by Nurse-Family Partnership. No later than July 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance (Department), shall begin providing Medicaid and NC Health Choice coverage for home visits statewide or through a pilot program.

“The Department shall develop a plan to implement changes necessary to provide Medicaid and NC Health Choice coverage for home visits statewide or through a pilot program; however, consistent with
G.S. 108A-54(e)(4), the Department is not authorized to make any changes to eligibility for the Medicaid or NC Health Choice programs. The plan shall detail the design and scope of coverage for the home visits for pregnant women and families with young children and include the identification of any State Plan Amendments or waivers that may be necessary to submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

“(b) No later than November 1, 2017, the Department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division a report containing the following information:

“(1) As required by subsection (a) of this section, a copy of the plan to provide, no later than July 1, 2018, Medicaid and NC Health Choice coverage for home visits statewide or through a pilot program.

“(2) A detailed description of the coverage to be provided, including the proposed service definition, the home visit schedule, the scope of the covered service, and the anticipated reimbursement rate to be paid.

“(3) An analysis of the total fiscal impact of adding Medicaid and NC Health Choice coverage for the home visits for pregnant women and families with young children. This shall include an outline of both costs and savings to the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs, as well as any savings to other programs provided by the State.

“(4) A description of how the Department intends to leverage any private funding that may be currently utilized to provide coverage for evidence-based home visits for pregnant women and families with young children.

“(5) Whether the Department intends to add this coverage pursuant to its authority under
G.S. 108A-54(e) or whether additional appropriations are required.

“(6) Any plans to include pay-for-success initiatives as part of the Medicaid and NC Health Choice funding for the covered service.

“(7) An anticipated time line for the implementation of the Department’s plan and the submission of any necessary State Plan Amendments or waivers to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 11H.3(a), (b), provides: “(a) No later than August 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services any State Plan amendments or waivers necessary to draw down a Medicaid federal match for coverage of the services provided under the County Pilot A design contained in the DHHS report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice dated January 24, 2018, entitled “Plan to Implement Coverage for Home Visits for Pregnant Women and Families with Young Children.” Coverage of the services provided under the County Pilot A design shall be expanded statewide upon the conclusion of the pilot. The State Plan amendment or waivers submitted under this section shall provide for the Medicaid federal match effective July 1, 2018, as well as for the future statewide implementation.

“(b) No later than November 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice on the expected savings associated with the County Pilot A design contained in the DHHS report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice dated January 24, 2018, entitled “Plan to Implement Coverage for Home Visits for Pregnant Women and Families with Young Children.” The report shall also include an expected time line for statewide implementation and expected outcomes and savings associated with the statewide expansion.

“No later than six months after the conclusion of the County Pilot A program, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division on the actual outcomes and savings achieved through the County Pilot A program.

“For the purposes of this subsection, the term “savings” shall include, but is not limited to, savings based on outcomes related to the health status of pregnant women and babies, the utilization of services based on cost, savings generated due to a decline in hospitalizations, and savings associated with future health care costs of the mother and child.”

Session Laws
2017-57, s. 11H.14A(a), (b), provides: “(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide opportunities to divert individuals in behavioral health crisis from hospital emergency departments to alternative appropriate care locations. Consistent with Option 1 outlined in the Department of Health and Human Services’ (Department) March 1, 2015, legislative report entitled ‘Ambulance Transports to Crisis Centers,’ the Department shall design a plan for adding Medicaid coverage for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations. The plan shall ensure the following:

“(1) Medicaid reimbursement is contingent upon an Emergency Medical Services (EMS) System’s ability to demonstrate its EMS providers have received appropriate education in caring for individuals in behavioral health crisis and that the EMS System has at least one partnership with a receiving facility that is able to provide care appropriate for those individuals.

“(2) An EMS System shall be required to include in its EMS System Plan a report on patient experiences and outcomes in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Regulation, Office of Emergency Medical Services.

“(b) No later than December 1, 2017, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice on the plan for adding Medicaid coverage for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations. The report shall include the following:

“(1) The proposed reimbursement methodology to be utilized.

“(2) An analysis of the financial impact of adding the coverage, including any anticipated costs to the Medicaid program.

“(3) Whether the Department intends to add this coverage pursuant to its authority under
G.S. 108A-54(e) or whether additional appropriations are required.

“(4) If the Department intends to add this coverage pursuant to its authority under
G.S. 108A-54(e), a time line for submission of any State Plan amendments or any waivers necessary for implementation and expected implementation date.”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 11H.4(a), (b), provides: “(a) No later than November 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) any State Plan amendments or any waivers necessary to establish Medicaid reimbursement for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations. Coverage under this section shall begin July 1, 2019, or upon CMS approval of any submitted State Plan amendments or waiver, whichever date is later.

“Coverage under this section shall meet the following requirements:

“(1) Medicaid reimbursement is contingent upon an Emergency Medical Services (EMS) System’s ability to demonstrate its EMS providers have received appropriate education in caring for individuals in behavioral health crisis and that the EMS System has at least one partnership with a receiving facility that is able to provide care appropriate for those individuals.

“(2) An EMS System shall be required to include in its EMS System Plan a report on patient experiences and outcomes in accordance with rules adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Regulation, Office of Emergency Medical Services.

“Medicaid reimbursement for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations shall not be implemented until CMS approval of any submitted State Plan amendments or waivers has been received.

“(b) No later than December 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice and the Fiscal Research Division on the following:

“(1) As required by subsection (a) of this section, a copy of the State Plan amendment or waiver to establish Medicaid reimbursement for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations to begin July 1, 2019, including the proposed reimbursement methodology to be utilized.

“(2) Expected costs to the State associated with the establishment of Medicaid reimbursement for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations.

“(3) Expected outcomes and savings associated with the establishment of Medicaid reimbursement for ambulance transports of Medicaid recipients in behavioral health crisis to behavioral health clinics or other alternative appropriate care locations. Expected outcomes shall include an analysis of a reduction of transfers from hospital settings, an improvement in referral to and coordination of follow-up care, and general health status outcomes that result when a recipient is transported to an alternative appropriate care setting. Expected savings shall include an analysis of the cost difference of treatment in the alternative appropriate care location instead of a hospital emergency room setting.

“(4) Whether this coverage shall be included in the capitated Prepaid Health Plan contracts required by S.L. 2015-245, the capitated contracts with LME/MCOs, as defined in

G.S. 122C-3

, or both.”

Study Direct Care Workers Serving Individuals in the Innovations Waiver Program and Develop a Plan for Any Recommended Increase in Those Workers' Wages.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.15C, provides: “No later than March 1, 2022, and annually thereafter for the next five years, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice that contains all of the following information regarding direct care workers who serve Medicaid beneficiaries receiving services through the North Carolina Innovations waiver program:

“(1) Statewide data on the number of these licensed and non licensed direct care workers by worker classification.

“(2) Identification of providers that employ these direct care workers.

“(3) The weekly average number of hours worked by individuals serving in these positions.

“(4) The average and range of wages paid to these workers.

“(5) The average length of employment of these workers by any one provider.

“(6) An assessment of whether the wages of licensed direct care workers, non licensed direct care workers, or both need to be increased. If DHB determines that there is a need for an increase in wages, then DHB shall develop a plan, or update to a previously submitted plan as applicable, for such increase.”

Evaluate DHB Needs in Managed Care Environment.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.18, provides: “(a) Evaluation. – The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), shall conduct a two part evaluation of the current staffing and administrative functions for the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs and how those staffing needs and administrative functions will change as the Medicaid and NC Health Choice programs move further into a managed care service delivery environment. In conducting this evaluation, DHB shall do all of the following:

“(1) Identify the changing administrative needs and required staff based upon the introduction of capitated contracts for standard benefit plans and BH IDD tailored benefit plans.

“(2) Determine whether any administrative or staffing functions are duplicative of any functions carried out through vendor contracts, by local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs), or prepaid health plans (PHPs).
